Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1091
School district; fiscal year.

The fiscal year of each school district shall commence on September 1 in each year and end on August 31 of each year.

Laws 1969, c. 706, § 1, p. 2708;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-810.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 737.

Fiscal year for purposes of the Special Education Act, see section 79-1143.